Louisiana, session 2026, HB777.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:402.1(A)(2)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 32:408(I) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§402.1. Driver education; required
A. No application for a license for the operation of a motor vehicle shall be
received from any person making application for the first time unless there is also
submitted with the application, on a form approved by the secretary of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, public safety services, written
evidence of the successful completion by the applicant of one of the following:
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-363 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 777
(2) A "prelicensing training course" administered by a Class "D" and "E"
driver education provider licensed and contracted pursuant to R.S. 40:1461 for any
person eighteen years or older if a driver education course is not completed. The
prelicensing training course shall consist of a minimum of six hours of classroom
instruction and a minimum of eight hours of actual driving instruction, including the
administering of the skills test. A person shall not be allowed to receive more than
four hours of actual driving instruction on any single calendar day. A properly
licensed third-party examiner may, at his discretion, administer the skills test to the
student prior to the conclusion of the eight hours of actual driving instruction. Upon
successful completion of the instruction and skills test, the third-party tester shall
provide the student with a department-approved certificate of successful completion
in a sealed envelope to be delivered to the department. If the student fails to
successfully complete the skills test, the third-party examiner shall issue a
department-approved certificate indicating completion of the driver education course
but failure of the skills test. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
public safety services, shall establish rules and regulations to administer and define
the requirements of the course. Oversight review of these rules shall be conducted
by the House and Senate committees on transportation, highways and public works
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The rules shall provide for:
* * *
§408. Examination of applicants required; classes of licenses
* * *
I.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each applicant
for the renewal of a Class "E" driver's license shall successfully complete a driver's
knowledge examination as provided in this Subsection.
(2) The renewal driver's knowledge examination required by this Subsection
shall be administered not more than once every eight years.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-363 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 777
(3)(a) The renewal driver's knowledge examination shall be developed and
administered by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, or an authorized third party, and shall include the following criteria:
(b) Assessment of the driver's knowledge of the following:
(i) Traffic laws of this state.
(ii) Roadway signage and markings.
(iii) Safe driving practices, including but not limited to distracted driving
laws and emerging roadway conditions.
(4)(a) The form of the examination shall be administered through one of the
following methods:
(i) Electronically via a secure online platform.
(ii) In person at official office of motor vehicle locations.
(iii) Electronically via mobile or remote service units, if made available by
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles.
(b) The examination shall be made accessible in various formats, including
but not limited to:
(i) Multiple language options.
(ii) Audio or written large-print formats.
(iii) Any other reasonable accommodations in accordance with applicable
state and federal law.
(5)(a) The applicant for a driver's license renewal shall achieve a minimum
passing score of eighty percent of the knowledge examination. Any applicant who
fails the examination shall be permitted not fewer than three attempts without an
additional fee.
(b) Failure to successfully complete the knowledge examination at the time
of renewal shall not result in the immediate suspension or revocation of driving
privileges.
(c)(i) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall issue a temporary renewal license that is valid for a period not to
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-363 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 777
exceed ninety days, during which the applicant may retake and successfully complete
the examination.
(ii) If the driver fails to successfully complete the knowledge examination
within the ninety days, the driver's license shall be automatically suspended until
successful completion of the examination.
(7) No additional fee shall be charged for the administration of the
knowledge examination when taken in conjunction with a license renewal.
(8) The provisions of this Section shall apply uniformly to all drivers for
Class "E" renewals and shall not impose additional requirements based solely upon
the age of the driver.
(9) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall submit an annual report to the House and Senate Committees on
transportation, highways and public works no later than February first and the report
shall include the following:
(a) The number of knowledge examinations administered.
(b) The pass and failure rates.
(c) The administrative costs associated with the implementation of this
Subsection.
(d) Any recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes.
Section 2. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall implement a public education program prior to January 1, 2028 to apprise the
public of new driver's license renewal examination requirements, including the availability
of practice knowledge examinations and educational materials.
Section 3.(A) This Section and Section 2 of this Act shall become effective upon
signature of the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for
bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
21 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor, and subsequently approved
by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
(B) Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-363 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 777